Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 4. Supervision.

§ 81-14-151.
Supervision.

The commissioner is empowered and directed to perform the duties and exercise the powers as to savings banks organized or operated under this chapter, except as otherwise provided herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 41; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 149; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-153.
Power of commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations; reproduction of records.

The commissioner shall have the authority to promulgate rules, instructions and regulations necessary to the discharge of his duties and powers for the supervision and regulation of savings banks and for the protection of the public investment in savings banks.

Without limiting the generality of subsection (1), rules, instructions and regulations may be promulgated with respect to:

Reserve requirements;

Stock ownership and dividends;

Stock transfers;

Incorporators, stockholders, directors, officers and employees of a savings bank;

Bylaws;

The operation of savings banks;

Deposit accounts, bonus plans and contracts for savings programs;

Loans and loan expenses;

Investments;

Forms and definitions;

Types of financial records to be maintained by savings banks;

Retention periods of various financial records;

Internal control procedures of savings banks;

Conduct and management of savings banks;

Chartering and branching;

Liquidations;

Mergers;

Conversions;

Reports which may be required by the commissioner;

Conflicts of interest;

Service corporations; and

Holding companies.

Any state savings bank may cause any or all of its records in its custody to be reproduced in a format of storage commonly used, whether electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic, or otherwise, and any reproduction so made shall have the same force and effect as the original thereof and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 42; Laws, 2000, ch. 335, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-155.
Examinations by commissioner; report.

If at any time the commissioner deems it prudent, it shall be his duty to examine and investigate everything relating to the business of a state savings bank, or a holding company thereof, and to appoint a suitable and competent person to make such investigation. The investigator shall file with the commissioner a full report of his finding in such case, including in his report any violation of law, or any unauthorized or unsafe practices of the savings bank, disclosed by his examination.

The commissioner shall furnish a copy of such report to the savings bank under investigation and may, upon request, furnish a copy of the report to the insurer of accounts.

No savings bank shall willfully delay or willfully obstruct an examination in any fashion. Any person failing to comply with this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

No person having in his possession or control any books, accounts or papers of any state savings bank shall refuse to exhibit such books, accounts or papers to the commissioner or his agents on demand, or shall knowingly or willingly make any false statement in regard to such books, accounts or papers. Any person failing to comply with this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 43; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-157.
Supervisory and other fees.

Every state savings bank, including savings banks in the process of voluntary liquidation, or a holding company thereof, shall pay into the office of the commissioner an annual supervisory fee and fees for various activities in the same amounts and in the same manner as charged to savings associations under Section 81-12-193.

All funds and revenue collected by the department under the provisions of this section and all other sections of this chapter which authorize the collection of fees and other funds, except for the civil penalties provided in Sections 81-14-203 and 81-14-205, shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the department and expended solely to defray expenses incurred by the office of the commissioner in carrying out the supervisory and auditing functions. The civil penalties provided in Sections 81-14-203 and 81-14-205 shall be deposited into the State General Fund, unless such penalty is appealed to a court of competent jurisdiction as provided in Section 81-14-213, in which case such penalty shall then be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the department until such appeal is resolved. If such appeal is resolved in favor of the department, then the commissioner shall notify and direct the State Treasurer to transfer the amount of such fine from the credit of the department to the credit of the State General Fund.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, whenever the commissioner under the provisions of Section 81-14-155 appoints a suitable and competent person, other than a person employed by the commissioner’s office, to make an examination and investigation of the business of a state savings bank, all costs and expenses relative to such examination and investigation shall be paid by such savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 44; Laws, 1994, ch. 622, § 150; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 44; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-159.
Prolonged audit, examination or revaluation; payments of costs.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner an examination conducted under the provisions of Section 81-14-155 fails to disclose the complete financial condition of a savings bank, he may in order to ascertain its complete financial condition:

Make an extended audit or examination of the savings bank, or cause such an audit or examination to be made by an independent auditor;

Make an extended revaluation of any of the assets or liabilities of the savings bank, or cause an independent appraiser to make such revaluation.

The commissioner shall collect from the savings bank a reasonable sum for actual or necessary expenses of such an audit, examination or revaluation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 45; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-161.
Commissioner to have right of access to books and records of savings banks; right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses.

The commissioner and his agents:

Shall have free access to all books and records of a savings bank, or a service corporation or holding company thereof, that relate to its business, and the books and records kept by any officer, agent or employee relating to the business of the savings bank;

May subpoena witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of any director, officer, agent or employee of a savings bank, or a service corporation or holding company thereof, or of any other person in relation to its affairs, transactions and conditions;

May require the production of records, books, papers, contracts and other documents; and

May order that improper entries be corrected on the books and records of a savings bank.

The commissioner may issue subpoenas duces tecum.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena so issued by the commissioner, or a party or witness refuses to testify on any matters, a court of competent jurisdiction, on the application of the commissioner, shall compel compliance by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify in such court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 46; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 46, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-163.
Test appraisals of collateral for loans; expense paid.

The commissioner may direct the making of test appraisals of real estate and other collateral securing loans made by savings banks doing business in this state, employ competent appraisers, or prescribe a list from which competent appraisers may be selected, for the making of such appraisals by the commissioner, or any and all other acts incident to the making of such test appraisals.

In lieu of such appraisals, the commissioner may accept an appraisal caused to be made by the insurer of accounts.

The expense and cost of test appraisals made pursuant to this section shall be defrayed by the savings bank subjected to such test appraisals. Each savings bank doing business in this state shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses of such test appraisals when directed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 47; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-165.
Relationship of savings banks with department.

Except as provided by subsection (3) of this section, a savings bank, or any director, officer, employee or representative thereof, shall not grant, directly or indirectly, to the commissioner or to any employee of the department, or to their spouses, any loan or gratuity.

Neither the commissioner, nor any employee of the department, shall:

Hold an office or position in any state savings bank, or exercise any right to vote on any state savings bank matter by reason of being a member of the savings bank;

Be interested, directly or indirectly, in any savings bank organized under the laws of this state; or

Undertake any indebtedness as a borrower, directly or indirectly, or act as endorser, surety or guarantor, or sell, or otherwise dispose of, any loan or investment to any savings bank organized under the laws of this state.

Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the commissioner, or any employee of the department, may be a deposit account holder, may receive earnings on such account and may receive a loan secured by the deposit account.

If the commissioner, or any employee of the department, has any prohibited right or interest in a savings bank, either directly or indirectly, at the time of his appointment, he shall dispose of it within sixty (60) days after the date of his appointment or employment. If the commissioner, or any employee of the department, is indebted as a borrower, directly or indirectly, or is an endorser, surety or guarantor on a note at the time of his appointment or employment, he may continue in such capacity until such loan is paid off.

If the commissioner, or any employee of the department, has a loan or other note acquired by a state savings bank through the secondary market, he may continue with the debt until such loan or note is paid off.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 48; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 48; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-167.
Confidential information.

The following records or information of the board, the commissioner, or the agent(s) of either, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed:

Information obtained or compiled in preparation of, or anticipation of, or during an examination, audit or investigation of any institution;

Information reflecting the specific collateral given by a named borrower, the specific amount of stock owned by a named stockholder, or specific deposit accounts held by a named member or customer;

Information obtained, prepared or compiled during or as a result of an examination, audit or investigation of any savings bank by an agency of the United States, if the records would be confidential under federal law or regulation;

Information and reports submitted by savings banks to federal regulatory agencies, if the records or information would be confidential under federal law or regulation;

Information and records regarding complaints from the public received by the department which concern savings banks when the complaint could result in an investigation, except to the management of those savings banks;

Any other letters, reports, memoranda, recordings, charts or other documents or records which would disclose any information of which disclosure is prohibited in this subsection.

A court of competent jurisdiction may order the disclosure of specific information.

The information contained in an application shall be deemed to be public information. Disclosure shall not extend to the financial statement of the incorporators nor to any further information deemed by the commissioner to be confidential.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the exchange of information relating to savings banks and the business thereof with the representatives of the agencies of this state, other states, or of the United States, or with reserve or insuring agencies for savings banks. The private business and affairs of an individual or company shall not be disclosed by any person employed by the department, any member of the board, or by any person with whom information is exchanged under the authority of this subsection.

Any official or employee violating this section shall be liable to any person injured by disclosure of such confidential information for all damages sustained thereby.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 49; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-169.
Statement filed by savings bank; publishing requirement.

The commissioner shall call upon each state savings bank for the reports required in this section. Such calls shall be made by the commissioner in writing by letter or other similar means of written communications for the same dates and as often as calls are issued by the appropriate federal regulating authority for reports from federal savings banks. The commissioner shall prescribe the forms for such reports. The reports shall be sworn to by either the president, vice president or cashier of the savings bank making them, attested by not less than two (2) of the board of directors, and shall exhibit in detail, under appropriate heads, the total resources and total liabilities of the bank on the day specified by the commissioner. Savings banks shall transmit to the department such call reports within a time limitation established by regulation by the commissioner; however, such time limitation cannot exceed that set by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for state insured savings banks. For any failure or delay in furnishing this report, the president, vice president or cashier of any such savings bank, so in default, and the members of the board of directors of the savings bank refusing to attest the report, shall be subject to an administrative fine, which may be imposed by the commissioner, of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) a day for each day while in such default.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 50; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-171.
Annual audit requirement.

The commissioner shall require that every state savings bank have its affairs audited at least once a year. The commissioner shall review such audit within a reasonable time after its completion.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 51; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 51; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-173.
Prohibited practices.

Any person who shall engage in any of the following acts shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined or imprisoned, or both, in the discretion of the court:

Defamation: Making, publishing, disseminating or circulating any oral, written or printed statement regarding the financial condition of any savings bank which is false.

False information and advertising: Making, publishing, disseminating, circulation or otherwise placing before the public in any publication, media, notice, pamphlet, letter, poster, or any other way, an advertisement, announcement or statement containing any assertion representation, or statement with respect to the savings bank business or with respect to any person in the conduct of the savings bank business which is untrue, deceptive or misleading.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 52; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 52; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-175.
Appeal from final rule, regulation or order of commissioner or board.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, any interested person aggrieved by any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner and/or the board, as applicable, shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved, to appeal to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County. However, if the appellant is an applicant for a charter, the appeal shall be taken to the circuit court of the county in which the proposed institution is domiciled; or if the appellant is seeking to establish a branch office, the appeal shall be taken to the circuit court of the county in which the proposed branch is located. Such appeal shall be taken and perfected as hereinafter provided, within thirty (30) days from the date of such final rule, regulation or order. The circuit court may affirm such rule, regulation or order, or remand for further proceedings as justice may require. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected, heard either in termtime or in vacation, and shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court as a preference cause. In perfecting any appeal provided by this section, the provisions of law respecting notice to the reporter and the allowance of bills of exception, now or hereafter in force, and those provisions respecting appeals from the circuit court to supreme court shall be applicable. However, the reporter shall transcribe his notes and file the transcript of the record with the commissioner or board within thirty (30) days after approval of the appeal bond. Upon the filing with the commissioner or board of a petition for appeal to the circuit court, it shall be the duty of the commissioner or board, within sixty (60) days after approval of the appeal bond to file with the clerk of the circuit court to which the appeal is taken a copy of the petition for appeal, the rule, regulation or order appealed from, and the original and one (1) copy of the transcript of the record of proceedings in evidence before the commissioner or board. After the filing of such petition, the appeal shall be perfected by filing of bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) with two (2) sufficient sureties, or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as the surety, conditioned to pay the cost of such appeal. Such bond shall be approved by the commissioner or by the clerk of the court to which such appeal is taken. The perfection of an appeal shall not stay or suspend the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or board, but the judge of such circuit court may award a writ of supersedeas to any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or board after five (5) days’ notice to the commissioner or board. Any order or judgment staying the operation of any rule, regulation or order of the commissioner or board shall contain a specific finding, based upon evidence submitted to the circuit judge and identified by reference thereto, that irreparable damage would result t o the appellant if he is denied relief. Such stay shall not become effective until a supersedeas bond shall have been executed and filed with and approved by the clerk of the court payable to the state. The bond shall be in an amount fixed by the circuit judge and conditioned as said circuit judge may direct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 53; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 53; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-177.
Credit allowed for savings banks; commissioner discretion.

In all examinations no savings bank shall be allowed credit in excess of its sound value for a note or security of which the principal and interest is over twelve (12) months past due; nor for any bond in excess of the real value thereof; nor for any stock of its own held more than twelve (12) months; nor for any unsecured overdrafts that may have existed for a greater period than thirty (30) days next preceding it, except that the period shall be ninety (90) days for unsecured overdrafts upon which interest is being charged if the savings bank has a written policy authorizing such overdrafts for not more than ninety (90) days. Only such overdrafts shall be considered as secure as are advanced against products or actual existing values evidenced by warehouse receipts or bills of lading, against bills of exchange drawn in good faith against actual existing values, or against funds on deposit by the depositor whose account is overdrawn, and who has pledged those funds as security for such overdraft, and in making up the statement of the condition of such savings bank any such item shall be charged off (but if desired a note shall be appended giving details thereof). But the discretion of the commissioner or examiner may be exercised in cases of estates in litigation or administration, and in pending suits, if the security affected thereby is ample, in the opinion of the commissioner or examiner making such examination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 54; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-179.
Commissioner to provide copy of call reports; failure or refusal; misdemeanor.

A copy of the call reports of any savings bank shall be furnished to any person or corporation requesting the same for a reasonable fee prescribed by the commissioner, which shall be collected by the commissioner and shall be paid into the department maintenance fund. If the commissioner fails or refuses to furnish copies of the report when so requested and tendered the proper fee; or if he fails to account for any such fees received by him; or if any person other than the commissioner, deputy commissioner, an examiner, or assistant furnishes any copy of such savings bank report to anyone, whether for a consideration or without consideration, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or be imprisoned not more than one (1) month in the county jail, or both. However, this section shall not be construed to prevent any officer of the savings bank from furnishing to anyone a statement of such savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 55; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 2001.